Massachusetts, session 194th, S2877.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Grafton may by bylaw prohibit or restrict the application
of second generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the town of Grafton, including the
application of such pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R.
10.00.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1